Alaska statutes. Title 1. General Provisions.
Article 2. General Definitions, Residency, and Rules of Statutory Construction.

Collateral references. —

73 Am. Jur. 2d, Statutes, § 60 et seq.

82 C.J.S., Statutes, § 364 et seq.

Sec. 01.10.020.
Applicability of AS 01.10.040 — 01.10.090.

The provisions of AS

01.10.040

—

01.10.090

shall be observed in the construction of the laws of the state unless the construction would be inconsistent with the manifest intent of the legislature.

History.

(§ 1 ch 62 SLA 1962)

Sec. 01.10.030.
Severability.

Any law heretofore or hereafter enacted by the Alaska legislature which lacks a severability clause shall be construed as though it contained the clause in the following language: “If any provision of this Act, or the application thereof to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of this Act and the application to other persons or circumstances shall not be affected thereby.”

History.

(§ 1 ch 98 SLA 1949)

Sec. 01.10.040.
Words and phrases; meaning of “including”.

Words and phrases shall be construed according to the rules of grammar and according to their common and approved usage. Technical words and phrases and those that have acquired a peculiar and appropriate meaning, whether by legislative definition or otherwise, shall be construed according to the peculiar and appropriate meaning.

When the words “includes” or “including” are used in a law, they shall be construed as though followed by the phrase “but not limited to.”

History.

(§ 2 ch 62 SLA 1962; am § 1 ch 21 SLA 1991)

Sec. 01.10.050.
Tense, number, and gender.

Words in the present tense include the past and future tenses, and words in the future tense include the present tense.

Words in the singular number include the plural, and words in the plural number include the singular.

Words of any gender may, when the sense so indicates, refer to any other gender.

History.

(§ 3 ch 62 SLA 1962; am § 3 ch 58 SLA 1982)

Sec. 01.10.055.
Residency.

A person establishes residency in the state by being physically present in the state with the intent to remain in the state indefinitely and to make a home in the state.

A person demonstrates the intent required under (a) of this section

by maintaining a principal place of abode in the state for at least 30 days or for a longer period if a longer period is required by law or regulation; and

by providing other proof of intent as may be required by law or regulation, which may include proof that the person is not claiming residency outside the state or obtaining benefits under a claim of residency outside the state.

A person who establishes residency in the state remains a resident during an absence from the state unless during the absence the person establishes or claims residency in another state, territory, or country, or performs other acts or is absent under circumstances that are inconsistent with the intent required under (a) of this section to remain a resident of this state.

History.

(§ 1 ch 67 SLA 1983)

Administrative Code. —

For permanent fund dividend program, see 15 AAC 23, art. 1.

For fishery identification system, administrative areas and annual fees, see 20 AAC 5, art. 2.

Sec. 01.10.060.
Definitions.

In the laws of the state, unless the context otherwise requires,

“action” includes any matter or proceeding in a court, civil or criminal;

“daytime” means the period between sunrise and sunset;

“month” means a calendar month unless otherwise expressed;

“municipality” means a political subdivision incorporated under the laws of the state that is a home rule or general law city, a home rule or general law borough, or a unified municipality;

“nighttime” means the period between sunset and sunrise;

“oath” includes affirmation or declaration;

“peace officer” means

an officer of the state troopers;

a member of the police force of a municipality;

a village public safety officer;

a regional public safety officer;

a United States marshal or deputy marshal; and

an officer whose duty it is to enforce and preserve the public peace;

“person” includes a corporation, company, partnership, firm, association, organization, business trust, or society, as well as a natural person;

“personal property” includes money, goods, chattels, things in action, and evidences of debt;

“property” includes real and personal property;

“real property” is coextensive with land, tenements, and hereditaments;

“signature” or “subscription” includes the mark of a person who cannot write, with the name of that person written near the mark by a witness who writes the witness’s own name near the name of the person who cannot write; but a signature or subscription by mark can be acknowledged or can serve as a signature or subscription to a sworn statement only when two witnesses so sign their own names to the sworn statement;

“state” means the State of Alaska unless applied to the different parts of the United States and in the latter case it includes the District of Columbia and the territories;

“writing” includes printing.

In the laws of the state, “lewd conduct,” “lewd touching,” “immoral conduct,” “indecent conduct,” and similar terms do not include the act of a woman breast-feeding a child in a public or private location where the woman and child are otherwise authorized to be. Nothing in this subsection may be construed to authorize an act that is an offense under AS

11.61.123

.

History.

(§ 4 ch 62 SLA 1962; am § 2 ch 66 SLA 1965; am § 10 ch 117 SLA 1968; am § 19 ch 74 SLA 1985; am § 1 ch 60 SLA 1990; am § 2 ch 78 SLA 1998; am § 2 ch 97 SLA 2001)

Revisor’s notes. —

Reorganized in 1985 to alphabetize the defined terms.

Cross references. —

For additional definition of “peace officer”, see AS

11.81.900(b)

; for listing of peace officers for purposes of the Fish and Game Code, see AS

16.05.150

; for a definition of “police officer”, see AS

18.65.290

; for legislative findings relating to the 1998 enactment of subsection (b), see § 1, ch. 78, SLA 1998 in the 1998 Temporary and Special Acts.

Opinions of attorney general. —

The statutory framework of the Alaska Statutes viewed as a whole contemplates that for any publicly employed law enforcement officer to be considered a peace officer within the meaning of present paragraph (7), he or she must be empowered with a full range of police duties and authority and must be currently functioning on essentially a full-time basis in that role. September 18, 1977 Op. Att’y Gen.

Law enforcement officers within the category “peace officers” as used in present paragraph (7) include, but are not limited to, state troopers, fish and wildlife protection officers and police officers employed by police departments of incorporated municipalities. September 18, 1977 Op. Att’y Gen.

Law enforcement officers with limited police authority with respect to specific statutes or ordinances are not police officers and are not necessarily peace officers either, at least within the meaning of present paragraph (7).
September 18, 1977 Op. Att’y Gen.

Comparing the classification of “peace officer” in present paragraph (7) with that of “police officer,” it is apparent that police officers, as defined in AS

18.65.290

(6) [now AS

18.65.290

(7)], are always peace officers since they have full police duties that are exercised on a full-time basis. However, the converse of this proposition can never be the case; that is, peace officer status does not automatically vest one with the status of a police officer since peace officers are not necessarily employees of a police department and do not necessarily have the power to enforce all the penal, traffic or highway laws of the state. September 18, 1977 Op. Att’y Gen.

Because AS 11.55.020 (now AS

11.61.220

) excepts only “peace officers” from the general prohibition against carrying concealed weapons, other persons, including state employees charged with limited law enforcement duties, unless a peace officer within the meaning of present paragraph (7), may not carry concealed weapons.
December 22, 1977 Op. Att’y Gen.

A comparison of the language of AS

18.65.010(b)

, which describes the general powers and duties of a specially commissioned officer, with that of AS

18.65.080

, which describes the powers and duties of commissioned officers of the Department of Public Safety with particular reference to “member” of the state troopers, supports the conclusion that a specially commissioned officer is a “peace officer” for purposes of both subsection (7) of this section and AS 11.55.020 (now AS

11.61.220

) when performing law enforcement duties within the limitations set forth on the face of a special commission and furthermore, may carry concealed weapons without violating AS 11.55.010 (now AS

11.61.220

) while performing these duties to the extent permitted by the commission itself.
December 22, 1977 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 01.10.065.
Registered mail, certified mail.

When the use of registered mail is authorized or required by the laws of the state, certified mail, with return receipt requested, may be used.

History.

(§ 1 ch 66 SLA 1965)